Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.230.091

High school and beyond plans—Best practices.

Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall work with school districts, including teachers, principals, and school counselors, educational service districts, the Washington state school directors' association, institutions of higher education that are authorized to participate in state financial aid programs under chapter 28B.92 RCW, students, and parents and guardians to identify best practices for high school and beyond plans that districts and schools may employ when complying with high school and beyond plan requirements adopted in accordance with RCW 28A.230.212 and 28A.230.215. The identified best practices, which must consider differences in enrollment and other factors that distinguish districts from one another, must be posted on the website of the office of the superintendent of public instruction by September 1, 2019, and may be revised periodically as necessary.

[ 2023 c 271 s 6; 2018 c 229 s 2.]

NOTES:

Intent—2023 c 271: See note following RCW 28A.230.215.